Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-601
Real property; acquire; improvements; schedule of charges.

Any county may acquire by lease, for a term not to exceed thirty years, purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, the necessary land within or without such county for the purpose of establishing an aviation field and to erect thereon such buildings and make such improvements as may be necessary for the purpose of adapting the field to the use of aerial traffic, and may, from time to time, fix and establish a schedule of charges for the use thereof, which charges shall be used in connection with the maintenance and operation of any such field and the activities thereof. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 1, p. 648.